California statutes. Vehicle Code
(f) The applicant or licensee has acted as a dealer by purchasing or selling vehicles while employed by a licensed dealer without reporting that fact to the dealer or without utilizing the report of sale documents issued to the dealer.

(g) The applicant or licensee has concurrently acted as a vehicle salesperson and engaged in that activity for, or on behalf of, more than one licensed dealer unless all of the licensed dealers for whom that salesperson works have common controlling ownership. Nothing in this section restricts the number of dealerships of which a person may be an owner, officer, or director, or precludes a vehicle salesperson from working for more than one dealer, provided that all of the licensed dealers for whom that salesperson works have common controlling ownership. For purposes of this subdivision, dealers have common controlling ownership when more than 50
 percent of the ownership interests in each dealer are held by the same person or persons, either directly or through one or more wholly owned subsidiary entities.

(h) The applicant or licensee has acted as a vehicle salesperson without having first complied with Section 11812.

(i) The applicant or licensee was a managerial employee of a dealer during the time a person under the direction or control of the managerial employee committed wrongful acts which resulted in the suspension or revocation of the dealer’s license.

(j) The applicant or licensee has acted as a dealer by purchasing or selling any vehicle and using the license, report of sale books, purchase drafts, financial institution accounts, or other supplies of a dealer to facilitate that purchase or sale, when the applicant or licensee is not acting on
 behalf of that dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 483, Sec. 4.   (SB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11808.

Every hearing provided for in this article shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

11808.5.

(a) After the filing of an accusation under this article, the director may enter into a stipulated compromise settlement agreement with the consent of the licensee on terms and conditions mutually agreeable to the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser without further hearing or appeal. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, a period of probation or monetary penalties, or both. Except as provided in Section 11728, the monetary penalty shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, and it shall be based on the nature of the violation and the effect of the violation on the purposes of this
 article.

(b) A compromise settlement agreement may be entered before, during, or after the hearing, but is valid only if executed and filed pursuant to subdivision (d) before the proposed decision of the hearing officer, if any, is adopted or the case is decided.

(c) The department shall adopt, by regulation, a schedule of maximum and minimum amounts of monetary penalties, the payment of which may be included as a term or condition of a compromise settlement agreement entered under subdivision (a). Any monetary penalty included in a compromise settlement agreement shall be within the range of monetary penalties in that schedule.

(d) Any compromise settlement agreement entered under this section shall be signed by the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser, or by their authorized representatives. The
 director shall file, or cause to be filed, the agreement with the Office of Administrative Hearings, together with the department’s notice of withdrawal of the accusation or statement of issues upon which the action was initiated.

(e) If the respondent licensee fails to perform all of the terms and conditions of the compromise settlement agreement, the agreement is void and the department may take any action authorized by law, notwithstanding the agreement, including, but not limited to, refiling the accusation or imposing license sanctions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 90, Sec. 5.   Effective May 9, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11810.

(a) The department may, pending a hearing, temporarily suspend the license issued to a vehicle salesperson for a period of not more than 30 days if the director finds that action to be required in the public interest. In that case, a hearing shall be held and a decision thereon issued within 30 days after notice of the temporary suspension.

(b) Except where the provisions of this code require the refusal to issue a license, the department may issue a probationary license subject to conditions to be observed by the licensee in the exercise of the privilege granted. The
 conditions to be attached to the exercise of the privilege shall be those which may, in the judgment of the department, be in the public interest and suitable to the qualifications of the applicant, as disclosed by the application and investigation by the department of the information contained in the application.

(c) If the department issues or renews a vehicle salesperson’s license requiring conditions of probation or if the department refuses to issue a vehicle salesperson’s license, the applicant may demand in writing a hearing before the director or the director’s representative within 60 days after notice of refusal to issue or issuance of the probationary license.

(d) A person whose license has been revoked or whose application for a license has been denied may reapply for a license after not less than one year has elapsed from the effective date of the decision revoking
 the license or denying the application, except that if the decision was based upon subdivision (a) of Section 11806, an earlier reapplication may be made accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the department that those grounds for revocation or denial of the license no longer exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

11812.

(a) A vehicle salesperson licensed under this article shall, at the time of employment, deliver his or her salesperson’s license to his or her employing dealer for the posting of the salesperson’s license or a true and exact copy of the salesperson’s license in a place conspicuous to the public at each location where he or she is actually engaged in the selling of vehicles for the employing dealer.

(b) The license, or a true and exact copy of the license, shall be displayed continuously at each location where he or she is actually engaged in the selling of vehicles during the employment. If a vehicle salesperson’s employment is terminated, the license shall be returned to the salesperson and all copies of the license used by the dealer for posting or display shall be destroyed by the dealer.

(c) A vehicle salesperson licensed pursuant to this article shall report in writing to the department every change of residence address within five days of the change.

(d) A person currently or previously licensed under this article who no longer resides at the address last filed with the department may be served with process issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code by registered mail at that residence, unless the person has notified the department in writing of another address where service may be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 483, Sec. 5.   (SB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11814.

(a) Every original vehicle salesperson’s license issued, and every vehicle salesperson’s license renewed, pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be valid for a period of three years from the date of issuance unless canceled, suspended, or revoked by the department.

(b) Renewal of a vehicle salesperson’s license may be made prior to the expiration date. A vehicle salesperson may not renew their license after the date of expiration.

(c) A salesperson shall obtain a duplicate license when the original is either lost or mutilated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 838, Sec. 6.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11819.

It is unlawful for a person:

(a) To lend a salesperson’s license to any other person or knowingly permit its use by another.

(b) To display or represent a salesperson’s license not issued to the person as being his or her license.

(c) To fail or refuse to surrender to the department, upon its lawful demand, a salesperson’s license that has been suspended, revoked, or canceled.

(d) To permit any unlawful use of a salesperson’s license issued to him or her.

(e) To photograph, photostat, duplicate, or in any way reproduce a salesperson’s license or facsimile thereof in a manner that it could be mistaken for a valid license, or to display or have in possession a photograph, photostat, duplicate, reproduction, or facsimile unless for display by a dealer, or as authorized by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 483, Sec. 6.   (SB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11820.

The following fees shall be paid to the department:

(a) Except as provided by Section 42231, a nonrefundable fee for the original issuance of a license, fifty dollars ($50).

(b) Fee for license renewal, fifty dollars ($50).

(c) Fee for a duplicate license, fifteen dollars ($15).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 90, Sec. 6.   Effective May 9, 1990.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

11822.

The vehicle salesperson’s license or any permit provided in this article shall be automatically canceled upon the failure of a licensee to pay the required fees or to file an application for renewal of the license or permit before the date of expiration of the current license or permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 499, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

11824.

The suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a vehicle salesperson’s license issued under this article does not prevent the filing of an accusation for the revocation or suspension of the suspended, expired, or canceled license as provided in Section 11806, and the department’s decision that the license should be suspended or revoked. That determination may be considered in granting or refusing to grant any subsequent license authorized by this division to that licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 57.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Representatives [11900. - 11909.]

11900.

It shall be unlawful for any person to act as a representative on or after July 1, 1974, without having first procured a license or temporary permit issued by the department or when such license or temporary permit has been canceled, suspended, revoked, or invalidated or has expired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 384.)
-------------------------------------------

11901.

The department shall prescribe and provide forms to be used for application for licenses to be issued under the terms and provisions of this chapter and require of such applicants, as a condition precedent to issuance of such license, such information touching on and concerning the applicant’s character, honesty, integrity and reputation as it may consider necessary. Every application for a representative’s license shall contain, in addition to such information as the department may require, a statement of the following facts:

(a) Name and address of the applicant.

(b) Whether the applicant has ever had a court judgment rendered for which he has been liable as a result of his activity in connection with an occupation licensed under this chapter and whether such judgment remains unpaid or unsatisfied.

(c) Whether the applicant ever had a license, issued under the authority of this chapter, revoked, suspended, or subjected to other disciplinary action and whether the applicant was ever a partner in a partnership or an officer, director, or stockholder in a corporation licensed under the authority of this chapter, the license of which was revoked, suspended, or subjected to other disciplinary action.

(d) Name, address, and license number of the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch employing the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

11902.

(a) The department shall issue a representative’s license when it finds and determines that the applicant has furnished the required information, and that the applicant intends in good faith to act as a representative and has paid the fees required by Sections 9262 and 11723.

(b) The department may refuse to issue, or may suspend or revoke, a license for any of the following reasons:

(1) The information in the
 application is incorrect.

(2) The applicant or licensee has been convicted of a crime or committed any act or engaged in any conduct involving moral turpitude which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensed activity. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(3) The applicant or licensee has outstanding an unpaid final court judgment rendered in connection with an activity licensed under this chapter.

(4) The applicant or licensee was previously the holder of, or was a business representative of a business which was the holder of, a license and certificate issued under this chapter which were revoked for cause and not reissued by the department or which were suspended for cause and the terms of suspension have not been
 fulfilled.

(5) The applicant was previously the holder of an occupational license issued by another state, authorizing the same or similar activities of a license issued under this division; and that license was revoked or suspended for cause and was never reissued, or was suspended for cause, and the terms of suspension have not been fulfilled.

(6) The applicant or licensee has committed any act prohibited by Section 11713.2 or 11713.3.

(c) Pending the determination of the department that the applicant has met the requirements of this chapter, it may issue a temporary permit to any person applying for a representative’s license. The temporary permit shall permit the operation by the representative for a period not to exceed 120 days while the department is completing its investigation and determination of all facts
 relative to the qualifications of the applicant for a license. The temporary permit is invalid after the applicant’s license has been issued or refused.

(d) The department may issue a probationary representative’s license based upon the existence of any circumstance set forth in subdivision (b), subject to conditions to be observed in the exercise of the privilege granted, either upon application for the issuance of a license or upon application for the renewal of a license. The conditions to be attached to the exercise of the privilege shall not appear on the face of the license but shall be those which, in the judgment of the department, are in the public interest and suitable to the qualifications of the applicant as disclosed by the application and investigation by the department of the information contained therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11902.5.

(a) The department, after notice and hearing, on an interim basis, may refuse to issue or may suspend a license issued under this chapter when the applicant or licensee has been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensed activity, if an appeal of the conviction is pending or the conviction has otherwise not become final. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(b) If a conviction, upon which an interim refusal to issue
 or suspension under subdivision (a) is based, is affirmed on appeal or otherwise becomes final, the refusal to issue or suspension shall automatically take effect as a denial or revocation, as the case may be, of the license. If the interim refusal to issue or suspension was stayed under probationary terms and conditions, the subsequent automatic denial or revocation shall also be stayed under the same terms and conditions for a term not to exceed the original term of probation for the interim refusal or suspension.

(c) If a conviction, upon which an interim refusal to issue or suspension under subdivision (a) is based, is reversed on appeal, the refusal or suspension shall be set aside immediately by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

11903.

(a) If the department suspends or revokes a representative’s license, the licensee shall be entitled to an appropriate hearing. Such hearing shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) If the department issues or renews a representative’s license requiring conditions of probation or if the department refuses to issue such license, the applicant shall be entitled to demand in writing a hearing as hereinabove provided before the director or his representative within 60 days after notice of refusal or
 issuance of the probationary license.

(c) A person whose representative’s license has been revoked or whose application for a license has been denied may reapply for such license after a period of not less than one year has elapsed from the effective date of the decision revoking the license or denying the application; provided, however, that if such decision was based upon paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 11902, an earlier reapplication may be made accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the department that such grounds no longer exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 934.)
-------------------------------------------

11903.5.

(a) After the filing of an accusation under this article, the director may enter into a stipulated compromise settlement agreement with the consent of the licensee on terms and conditions mutually agreeable to the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser without further hearing or appeal. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, a period of probation or monetary penalties, or both. The monetary penalty shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, and it shall be based on the nature of the violation and the effect of the violation on the purposes of this article.

(b) A compromise settlement agreement may be entered before, during, or after the hearing, but is valid only if executed and filed pursuant to subdivision (d) before the proposed decision of the hearing officer, if any, is adopted or the case is decided.

(c) The department shall adopt, by regulation, a schedule of maximum and minimum amounts of monetary penalties, the payment of which may be included as a term or condition of a compromise settlement agreement entered under subdivision (a). Any monetary penalty included in a compromise settlement agreement shall be within the range of monetary penalties in that schedule.

(d) Any compromise settlement agreement entered under this section shall be signed by the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser, or by their authorized representatives. The director shall
 file, or cause to be filed, the agreement with the Office of Administrative Hearings, together with the department’s notice of withdrawal of the accusation or statement of issues upon which the action was initiated.

(e) If the respondent licensee fails to perform all of the terms and conditions of the compromise settlement agreement, the agreement is void and the department may take any action authorized by law notwithstanding the agreement, including, but not limited to, refiling the accusation or imposing license sanctions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1022, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

11904.

Every representative’s license issued hereunder shall expire at midnight on the 30th day of June of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

11905.

Every application for the renewal of a representative’s license which expires on the 30th day of June shall be made by the person to whom issued between June 1st and midnight of June 30th preceding such expiration date and shall be made by presenting the application form provided by the department and by payment of the full annual renewal fee for such license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

11907.

The representative’s license, or any permit provided for in this chapter, shall be automatically canceled upon the failure of the licensee to file an application for renewal of the license or permit before July 1st following the expiration date of the current license or permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

11908.

The suspension, expiration, or cancellation of the representative’s license provided for in this chapter shall not prevent the filing of an accusation for revocation or suspension of the suspended, expired, or canceled license as provided in Section 11903, and the department’s decision that such license should be suspended or revoked. Such determination may be considered in granting or refusing to grant any subsequent license authorized by Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100) to such licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

11909.

Upon issuance by the department to the licensee, the license provided in this article shall be immediately delivered to and posted in a place conspicuous to the public at the place of business of the manufacturer, manufacturer’s branch, distributor, distributor’s branch from which the representative is directly supervised and shall be continuously exhibited in such place while the representative is employed by such employer.

In the event a representative’s employment is terminated, the license shall be forwarded to the department by the manufacturer, manufacturer’s branch, distributor, distributor’s branch not later than the end of
 the third business day after termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 384.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Sale of Housecars [11930. - 11931.]

11930.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “First-stage manufacturer” with reference to a housecar means the manufacturer of the engine, chassis, and drive train of the vehicle.

(b) “Second-stage manufacturer” means the installer of the structure and equipment permanently upon the engine, chassis, and drive train of the vehicle rendering the vehicle complete and suitable for human habitation and ready for delivery to the dealer or the buyer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 853, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11931.

(a) The dealer shall give the purchaser of a new housecar a list of every express warranty, of which he has notice, that has been issued on the housecar, or a part thereof, by the first-stage manufacturer, the second-stage manufacturer, the dealer, or any other party. The dealer shall also give the purchaser a copy of each warranty.

(b) The purchaser shall sign the list as an acknowledgment that he has received each warranty listed. The dealer shall sign to signify that all express warranties applicable to the housecar appear on the list. Both the purchaser and the dealer shall retain a copy of the list.

(c) Violation of this section is an infraction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 853, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Sale of Used Vehicles [11950. - 11950.]

11950.

(a) A buy-here-pay-here dealer shall affix a label on any used vehicle being offered for retail sale that states the reasonable market value of that vehicle. The label shall meet all of the following conditions:

(1) Be in writing.

(2) Be printed with a heading that reads “REASONABLE MARKET VALUE OF THIS VEHICLE” in at least 16-point bold type and text in at least 12-point type.

(3) Be located adjacent to the window sticker identifying the equipment provided with the vehicle or, if none, it shall be located prominently and conspicuously on the
 vehicle so that it is readily readable.

(4) Contain the information used to determine the reasonable market value of the vehicle, including, but not limited to, the use of a nationally recognized pricing guide for used vehicles.

(5) Contain the date the reasonable market value was determined.

(6) Indicate that the reasonable market value is being provided only for comparison shopping and is not the retail sale price or the advertised price of the vehicle.

(b) A buy-here-pay-here dealer shall provide to a prospective buyer of the used vehicle a copy of any information obtained from a nationally recognized pricing guide that the buy-here-pay-here
 dealer used to determine the reasonable market value of the vehicle.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Reasonable market value” means the average retail value of a used vehicle based on the condition, mileage, year, make, and model of the vehicle, as determined within the last 60 days by a nationally recognized pricing guide that provides used vehicle retail values or pricing reports to vehicle dealers or the public.

(2) “Nationally recognized pricing guide” includes, but is not limited to, the Kelley Blue Book (KBB), Edmunds, the Black Book, or the National Automobile Dealers’ Association (NADA) Guide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 741, Sec. 1.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Sale of Automobile Parts [12000. - 12003.]

12000.

The Bureau of Automotive Repair in the Department of Consumer Affairs shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. The Bureau of Automotive Repair shall investigate and inspect retail outlets to insure compliance with this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.

(a) Any person who sells and installs new parts in passenger cars, in the ordinary course of his business, shall provide the customer with an invoice which identifies by brand name, or other comparable designation, the part or parts installed.

(b) Any person who sells and installs used or factory rebuilt parts in passenger cars, in the ordinary course of his business, shall provide the customer with an invoice which specifically designates the used part or parts installed.

(c) This section shall not apply to any fitting or other device necessary to the installation of any new, used or factory rebuilt part subject to the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.

No person shall knowingly manufacture, sell, or install in any vehicle, any vehicle part which, under the provisions of Chapter 301 (commencing with Section 30101) of Part A of Subtitle VI of Title 49 of the United States Code, is, or has been, determined to be defective and subject to customer notification or recall.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 20.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.

Any violation of this chapter shall be a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Private Party Vehicle Markets [12101. - 12104.]

12101.

Any transaction which is regulated by this chapter shall not be subject to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625) of Chapter 9 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, regulating transactions in identifiable secondhand tangible personal property. No person shall be considered a “secondhand dealer” within the meaning of Section 21661 of the Business and Professions Code because of activities regulated by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 525.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.

The following definitions apply with respect to this chapter:

(a) “Private party vehicle market” means any event conducted under any of the following circumstances:

(1) An event at which two or more vehicles are offered or displayed for sale or exchange and a fee is charged for the privilege of offering or displaying the vehicles for sale or exchange.

(2) An event at which a fee is charged to prospective buyers for admission to the area where vehicles are offered or displayed for sale or exchange.

(3) An event, other than one conducted by a person listed in subdivision (a) of Section 286, at which used vehicles are offered or displayed for sale or exchange if such event is held at the same place more than six times in any 12-month period, regardless of the number of persons offering or displaying vehicles or the absence of fees.

(b) “Private party vehicle market operator” means any person who controls, manages, conducts, or otherwise administers a private party vehicle market.

(c) “Vendor” means any person who exchanges, sells, or offers for sale or exchange any vehicle at a private party vehicle market.

(d) Any event arranged or sponsored, or both, by a dealer licensed pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100) shall not be considered a private party vehicle market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 525.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.

(a) Every private party vehicle market operator shall maintain a record, for not less than one year, of all of the following information: 

(1) The name of each vendor selling, exchanging, or offering for sale or exchange, any vehicle at a private party vehicle market. 

(2) The vendor’s driver’s license number. 

(3) The registration number assigned to the vehicle and the vehicle identification number. 

(4) The number of the vehicle’s current and valid certificate of compliance. 

(5) The make, model, and color of the vehicle. 

(b) That information shall be made available, upon request, to any peace officer and to any employee of the department designated by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1054, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.

(a) Every private party vehicle market operator shall supply, to vendors, sufficient forms which are necessary to comply with Section 5900.

(b) Every private party vehicle market operator shall supply, to vendors, all information made available by the department to the general public regarding all existing provisions of law pertaining to requirements for the transfer of vehicle ownership and registration between parties who are not dealers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 525.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Towing [12110. - 12111.]

12110.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no towing service shall provide and no person or public entity shall accept any direct or indirect commission, gift, or any compensation whatever from a towing service in consideration of arranging or requesting the services of a tow truck. As used in this section, “arranging” does not include the activities of employees or principals of a provider of towing services in responding to a request for towing services.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not preclude a public entity otherwise authorized by law from requiring a fee in connection with the award of a franchise for towing vehicles on behalf of that public entity. However, the fee in those cases may not exceed the amount necessary to reimburse the public entity for its actual and reasonable costs incurred in connection with the towing program.

(c) Any towing service or any employee of a towing service that accepts or agrees to accept any money or anything of value from a repair shop and any repair shop or any employee of a repair shop that pays or agrees to pay any money or anything of value as a commission, referral fee, inducement, or in any manner a consideration, for the delivery or the arranging of a delivery of a vehicle, not owned by the repair shop or towing service, for the purpose of storage or repair, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable as set forth in subdivision (d). Nothing in this subdivision prevents a towing service from towing a vehicle to a repair shop owned by the same company that owns the towing service.

(d) Any person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) or (c) shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon first conviction, by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment. If the violation of subdivision (a) or (c) is committed by a tow truck driver, the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended by the department under Section 13351.85. The clerk of the court shall send a certified abstract of the conviction to the department. If the violation of either subdivision (a) or (c) is committed by a tow truck driver, the court may order the impoundment of the tow truck involved for not more than 15 days.

(2) Upon a conviction of a violation of subdivision (a) or (c) that occurred within seven years of one or more separate convictions of violations of subdivision (a) or (c), by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. If the violation of subdivision (a) or (c) is committed by a tow truck driver, the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended by the department under Section 13351.85. The clerk of the court shall send a certified abstract of the conviction to the department. If the violation of either subdivision (a) or (c) is committed by a tow truck owner, the court may order the impoundment of the tow truck involved for not less than 15 days but not more than 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 641, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12111.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no city or city and county may impose a business license tax for revenue-raising purposes on the operation of a tow truck in its jurisdiction if the vehicle tower maintains no fixed place of business within the boundaries of the city or city and county.

(b) A city or city and county may impose a business license tax upon a vehicle tower doing business within its jurisdiction who has no fixed place of business therein, if the license tax is graduated according to gross receipts attributable to work done within the city or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 924, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Sales of Vehicles by Private Owners [12120. - 12121.]

12120.

Only a dealer, a person described in Section 286, or the registered owner of record shall sell or offer for sale a vehicle of a type required to be registered pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) or identified pursuant to Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000), except as provided in Section 12121.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 668, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12121.

(a) Section 12120 does not apply to a dealer licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) when acting under authority of the license, or to his or her authorized agent.

(b) Section 12120 does not prohibit the sale of a vehicle by any of the following persons not engaged in the business of selling vehicles:

(1) Anyone related by blood, adoption, or marriage to the registered owner.

(2) The receiver, administrator, executor, guardian, or other person appointed by, or acting under, a judgment or order of any court.

(3) The trustee of a trust in which the vehicle is registered as an asset.

(4) Any public officer in the performance of his or her official duties.

(5) An attorney on behalf of a client who is the registered owner.

(6) The owner, officer, or designated representative of a business in whose name the vehicle is registered.

(7) The legal owner as shown on the certificate of ownership.

(8) A person who has prior written authorization from the registered owner of the vehicle, and that person does not receive or expect to receive a commission, money, brokerage fees, profit, or any other thing of value from either the seller or purchaser of the vehicle.

(9) An insurer selling the salvage of one of its insured’s vehicle or the stolen vehicle of one of its insured which has been recovered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 668, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Consumer Recovery Fund [12200. - 12217.]

12200.

The following definitions apply to this chapter:

(a) “Application” means an application to the recovery corporation for the payment of an eligible claim from the recovery fund that is filed with the recovery corporation after January 1, 2009.

(b) “Consumer” means a person who either (1) purchased or leased, or became obligated to purchase or lease, a motor vehicle to be used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes from a dealer or lessor-retailer licensed under this code, or (2) consigned for sale a motor vehicle that was used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes to a dealer licensed under this code.

(c) “Eligible claim” means an unsatisfied claim for economic loss, not barred by the statutes of limitation, that accrues after July 1, 2008, as a result of the failure of a dealer licensed under this code, or, if applicable, a lessor-retailer licensed under this code, to do any of the following:

(1) Remit license or registration fees received or contractually obligated to be paid from a consumer to the department.

(2) Pay to the legal owner of a vehicle transferred as a trade-in by a consumer to the dealer or lessor-retailer the amount necessary to discharge the prior credit balance owed to the legal owner.

(3) Pay to the lessor registered in accordance with Section 4453.5 of a vehicle transferred as a trade-in by a consumer to the dealer or
 lessor-retailer the amount the dealer or lessor-retailer agreed to pay to the lessor.

(4) Pay the amount specified in a consignment agreement to a consumer after the sale of a consigned vehicle.

(5) Provide a consumer who purchased a vehicle from the dealer or lessor-retailer with good title to the vehicle, free from any security interest or other lien, encumbrance, or claim, unless otherwise clearly and conspicuously provided for by the written sale agreement.

(6) Pay to a third party any amount received from, or contractually obligated to be paid by, a consumer for insurance, service contracts, or goods or services purchased through the dealer or lessor-retailer and to be provided by the third party.

(d) “Participant” means a dealer licensed under
 this code or a lessor-retailer licensed under this code.

(e) “Recovery corporation” means the Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation.

(f) “Recovery fund” means the consumer recovery fund established by the recovery corporation pursuant to Section 12203 for the payment of eligible claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 392, Sec. 3.   (AB 501)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.
